Wisconsin, session 2025, SB509.
do enact as follows:SB509,14Section 1. 5.02 (12n) of the statutes is amended to read:SB509,2,755.02 (12n) “Overseas elector” means a U.S. citizen who is residing outside of 1the United States, who is not disqualified from voting under s. 6.03, who has 2attained or will attain the age of will be at least 18 by years of age on the date of an 3election at which the citizen proposes to vote or, if voting in a primary, will be 18 4years of age on the date of the election following the primary, who was last 5domiciled in this state or whose parent was last domiciled in this state immediately 6prior to the parent’s departure from the United States, and who is not registered to 7vote or voting in any other state, territory, or possession.SB509,28Section 2. 6.02 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB509,2,1296.02 (1) Every U.S. citizen age 18 or older, or age 17 on the date of a primary 10for an election to be held on a date on which the citizen will be age 18, who has 11resided in an election district or ward for 28 consecutive days before any election 12where the citizen offers to vote is an eligible elector.SB509,313Section 3. 6.02 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB509,2,19146.02 (2) Any U.S. citizen age 18 or older, or age 17 on the date of a primary for 15an election to be held on a date on which the citizen will be age 18, who moves 16within this state later than 28 days before an election shall vote at his or her 17previous ward or election district if the person is otherwise qualified. If the elector 18can comply with the 28-day residence requirement at the new address and is 19otherwise qualified, he or she may vote in the new ward or election district.SB509,420Section 4. 6.05 of the statutes is amended to read:SB509,3,4216.05 Election day age determines elector’s voting rights. Any person 22who will be at least 18 years old of age on or before election day is entitled to vote at 23an election if the person is otherwise qualified to vote and the person complies with 1this chapter. Any person who is 17 years of age on the date of a primary for an 2election to be held on a date on which the person will be 18 years of age is entitled to 3vote at the primary if the person is otherwise qualified to vote and the person 4complies with this chapter.SB509,55Section 5. 6.22 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB509,3,1866.22 (6) Military elector list. Each municipal clerk shall keep an up-to-7date list of all eligible military electors who reside in the municipality in the format 8prescribed by the commission. The list shall contain the name, latest-known 9military residence and military mailing address of each military elector. The list 10shall indicate whether each elector whose name appears on the list is a military 11elector, as defined in s. 6.34 (1), and has so certified under s. 6.865 (3m). All persons 12over who are at least 18 years of age or who will be 18 years old prior to of age on the 13date of an election or, if voting in a primary, will be 18 years of age on the date of the 14election following the primary shall be listed and remain on the list for the duration 15of their tour of duty. The list shall be kept current through all possible means. 16Each clerk shall exercise reasonable care to avoid duplication of names or listing 17anyone who is not eligible to vote. Each clerk shall distribute one copy of the list to 18the each polling place in the municipality for use on election day.SB509,619Section 6. 6.24 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB509,4,5206.24 (1) Definition. In this section, except as otherwise provided, “overseas 21elector” means a U.S. citizen who is not disqualified from voting under s. 6.03, who 22has attained or will attain the age of 18 by will be at least 18 years of age on the date 23of an election at which the citizen proposes to vote or, if voting in a primary, will be 118 years of age on the date of the election following the primary, and who does not 2qualify as a resident of this state under s. 6.10, but who was last domiciled in this 3state or whose parent was last domiciled in this state immediately prior to the 4parent’s departure from the United States, and who is not registered to vote or 5voting in any other state, territory or possession.SB509,76Section 7. 6.94 of the statutes is amended to read:SB509,4,2376.94 Challenged elector oath. If the person challenged refuses to answer 8fully any relevant questions put to him or her by the inspector under s. 6.92, the 9inspectors shall reject the elector’s vote. If the challenge is not withdrawn after the 10person offering to vote has answered the questions, one of the inspectors shall 11administer to the person the following oath or affirmation: “You do solemnly swear 12(or affirm) that: you are at least 18 years of age or, if voting in a primary, will be 18 13years of age on the date of the election following the primary; you are a citizen of the 14United States; you are now and for 28 consecutive days have been a resident of this 15ward except under s. 6.02 (2); you have not voted at this election; you have not made 16any bet or wager or become directly or indirectly interested in any bet or wager 17depending upon the result of this election; you are not on any other ground 18disqualified to vote at this election”. If the person challenged refuses to take the 19oath or affirmation, the person’s vote shall be rejected. If the person challenged 20answers fully all relevant questions put to the elector by the inspector under s. 6.92, 21takes the oath or affirmation, and fulfills the applicable registration requirements, 22and if the answers to the questions given by the person indicate that the person 23meets the voting qualification requirements, the person’s vote shall be received.SB509,81Section 8. 7.52 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB509,5,2227.52 (5) (b) For the purpose of deciding upon ballots that are challenged for 3any reason, the board of absentee ballot canvassers may call before it any person 4whose absentee ballot is challenged if the person is available to be called. If the 5person challenged refuses to answer fully any relevant questions put to him or her 6by the board of absentee ballot canvassers under s. 6.92, the board of absentee 7ballot canvassers shall reject the person’s vote. If the challenge is not withdrawn 8after the person offering to vote has answered the questions, one of the members of 9the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall administer to the person the following 10oath or affirmation: “You do solemnly swear (or affirm) that: you are at least 18 11years of age or, if voting in a primary, will be 18 years of age on the date of the 12election following the primary; you are a citizen of the United States; you are now 13and for 28 consecutive days have been a resident of this ward except under s. 6.02 14(2), stats.; you have not voted at this election; you have not made any bet or wager or 15become directly or indirectly interested in any bet or wager depending upon the 16result of this election; you are not on any other ground disqualified to vote at this 17election.” If the person challenged refuses to take the oath or affirmation, the 18person’s vote shall be rejected. If the person challenged answers fully all relevant 19questions put to the elector by the board of absentee ballot canvassers under s. 6.92, 20takes the oath or affirmation, and fulfills the applicable registration requirements, 21and if the answers to the questions given by the person indicate that the person 22meets the voting qualification requirements, the person’s vote shall be received.SB509,923Section 9. Nonstatutory provisions.SB509,6,71(1) The following question shall be submitted to the vote of the electors at the 2general election to be held in November 2026: “Shall 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this 3act), which extends the right to vote in a primary to an individual who is 17 years of 4age if the individual will be 18 years of age on the date on which the election 5following the primary is held, become effective on January 1, 2027?” If the question 6is approved by the majority of all votes cast on the question at the election, this act 7shall become law; otherwise, this act shall not take effect.SB509,108Section 10. Effective dates. This act takes effect on January 1, 2027, if the 9condition set forth in Section 9 (1) of this act is satisfied, except as follows:SB509,6,1010(1) Section 9 (1) of this act takes effect on the day after publication.SB509,6,1111